Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB265.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 299 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "company":
(a) Means an entity organized under:
1. This chapter; or
2. Any law of this state for the purpose of transacting the business of insurance upon the
cooperative or assessment plan, as set forth in KRS 299.020; and
(b) Includes a company as defined in KRS 299.010(3) or (4).
(2) A solvent company that is not the subject of a delinquency proceeding under Subtitle 33 of KRS Chapter
304 may voluntarily dissolve in accordance with the requirements of this section.
(3) (a) A company seeking to voluntarily dissolve under this section shall dissolve under a dissolution plan
that:
1. Is in writing;
2. Provides for:
a. The disposition, by bulk reinsurance or other lawful procedure, of all insurance in
force with the company; and
b. Full discharge of all obligations of the company;
3. Designates or provides for one (1) or more trustees to conduct and administer the settlement of
the company's affairs;
4. Is authorized by its board of directors;
5. Is approved or adopted by policyholders or members by vote of not less than two-third (2/3) of
the policyholders or members voting thereon at a special meeting of the policyholders or
members called and held pursuant to any reasonable notice and information as the
commissioner approves; and
6. Is filed with and approved by the commissioner.
(b) The commissioner shall approve a dissolution plan that complies with paragraph (a) of this
subsection unless the commissioner determines the plan is:
1. Unlawful;
2. Unfair;
3. Inequitable; or
4. Prejudicial to the interests of members, policyholders, or creditors.
(4) The trustee or trustees designated in a dissolution plan filed by a company under subsection (3) of this
section shall:
(a) Upon approval of the plan by the commissioner, execute the plan; and
(b) Certify, under oath and in writing, in articles of dissolution prepared in accordance with state law
and filed with the commissioner, the date when all liabilities of the company have been discharged or
otherwise adequately provided for, and all assets of the company have been liquidated and
distributed, in accordance with the plan.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) (a) The commissioner shall make an examination, in a manner the commissioner deems advisable, of
the affairs and liquidation of a company that voluntarily dissolves under this section.
(b) If, upon examination, the commissioner finds that the facts set forth in, and form of, the articles of
dissolution filed by the trustee or trustees under subsection (4)(b) of this section are accurate and in
compliance with state law, the commissioner shall:
1. Inscribe his or her approval on the articles; and
2. Provide the approved articles to the company.
(c) The company shall:
1. Deliver the articles of dissolution approved by the commissioner under paragraph (b) of this
subsection to the Secretary of State for filing; and
2. Submit proof of the filing made under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph to:
a. The commissioner; and
b. The trustee or trustees.
(d) The trustee or trustees that receive proof under paragraph (c)2. of this subsection of a filing made
under paragraph (c)1. of this subsection shall:
1. File, for recording, a copy of the articles of dissolution filed with the Secretary of State in the
office of the county clerk of the county in which the company's principal place of business is
or was located; and
2. Retain a copy, including proof of filing, of the articles of dissolution filed with the Secretary of
State under paragraph (c)1. of this subsection for the company's records.
(6) The corporate existence of a company dissolved under this section shall forever be terminated upon the
effective date of the articles of dissolution filed with the Secretary of State under subsection (5)(c)1. of this
section.
Section 2. KRS 304.50-010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) [The commissioner may authorize twenty (20) or more employers with common interests or
membership in a bona fide trade association, or two (2) or more governmental entities, to enter into
agreements to pool their liabilities under KRS Chapter 342 for the purpose of qualifying as ]A workers'
compensation self-insured group authorized by the commissioner prior to July 15, 2027, may continue
to operate in accordance with the authorization and this subtitle[under this subtitle and KRS
342.350]. Any heterogeneous self-insured group so authorized may contract and may sue and be sued in
the name adopted by the group.
(b) On and after July 15, 2027, additional workers' compensation self-insured groups shall not be
authorized by the commissioner for the purpose of qualifying as a self-insured group under this
subtitle or Section 3 of this Act.
(2) The commissioner shall:
(a) Promulgate administrative regulations as necessary to govern[ admission, certification, and] regulation
of workers' compensation self-insured groups as authorized by this section and KRS 342.350;[. The
commissioner shall ]
(b) Take any and all action necessary to effectuate the provisions of this subtitle; and[. The commissioner
shall ]
(c) Be responsible for maintaining records obtained or prepared in association with this oversight.
(3) The Governor may assign the regulatory authority under this subtitle to another board or agency pursuant to
KRS 12.028.
(4) Except as specifically provided in this subtitle, no other provision of this chapter shall apply to a workers'
compensation self-insured group.
Section 3. KRS 342.350 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 84 3
(1) In order to comply with KRS 342.340, groups of employers may form, either among themselves or with
employers in other states, mutual insurance associations, or reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges subject to
the insurance laws of this state and any reasonable conditions and restrictions not inconsistent therewith fixed
by the commissioner. Membership in these mutual insurance associations or reciprocal or interinsurance
exchanges so approved, together with evidence of the payment of premiums due, shall be evidence of
compliance with KRS 342.340.
(2) The commissioner may, except as provided in subsection (3), require any mutual insurance association or
reciprocal or interinsurance exchange to purchase an annuity or to effect reinsurance with a company
authorized to transact insurance in this state or to make a deposit with a bank or trust company of this state that
shall in either case be approved by the commissioner for the purpose of fully securing the payment of all
deferred installments upon any claim for compensation.
(3) Any mutual insurance association or reciprocal or interinsurance exchange possessing a surplus of at least one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and not less in amount than the capital required of a domestic stock
insurance company transacting the same kind of insurance shall not be required to purchase an annuity or
effect reinsurance with a company authorized to transact insurance in this state or to make a deposit with a
bank or trust company of this state for the purpose of fully securing the payment of all deferred installments
upon any claim for compensation.
(4) In addition, self-insured groups may be authorized under the provisions of KRS 304.50-010 and
administrative regulations promulgated by the commissioner of the Department of Insurance[, twenty (20) or
more employers with common interests or membership in a bona fide trade association or two (2) or more city,
county, charter county, urban-county, or consolidated local government employers or their agencies may enter
into agreements to pool their liabilities under this chapter for the purpose of qualifying as self-insured groups].
Any heterogeneous self-insured group so authorized may contract and may sue and be sued in the name
adopted by the group.
Section 4. Sections 2 and 3 of this Act take effect July 15, 2027.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version